Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1608
Private postsecondary career school; minimum standards.

The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish minimum standards according to which a private postsecondary career school shall be maintained and operated in the state. A new school shall demonstrate that it can be maintained and operated in accordance with such standards. The standards shall include, but not be limited to, provisions on educational quality, facilities, equipment, qualification of administrators and instructors, publication of catalogs, credentials awarded, records, building and sanitation standards, financial stability, advertising, refund of unearned tuition and fees, and any other aspects deemed necessary by the board.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 8;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2808;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 8.